el: Σχεδιασμός πτερυγίων προπέλας: 3 λεπίδων; 4 λεπίδων; 5 λεπίδων; Άλλο
it: Design della pala dell'elica: A 3 lame; A 4 lame; A 5 lame; Altro
lt-LT: Propelerio mentės dizainas: 3 mentės; 4 mentės; 5 mentės; Kita
hu: Propellerlapát kialakítása: 3 pengés; 4 pengés; 5 pengés; Egyéb
bg-BG: Дизайн на лопатките на витлото: 3-лопатков; 4-лопатков; 5-лопатков; Други
fi: Potkurin lavan muotoilu: 3-teräinen; 4-teräinen; 5-teräinen; Muu
ru: Конструкция лопасти пропеллера: 3-лопастной; 4-лопастной; 5-лопастной; Другой
ja: プロペラブレードの種類: 3枚刃; 4枚刃; 5枚刃; その他
zh-CN: 螺旋桨叶片设计: 3 叶片; 4 叶片; 5 叶片; 其他
vi: Thiết kế cánh quạt: 3 cánh; 4 cánh; 5 cánh; Khác
pt-PT: Design da pá da hélice: 3 lâminas; 4 lâminas; 5 lâminas; Outro
th: การออกแบบใบพัด: 3 ใบมีด; 4 ใบมีด; 5 ใบมีด; อื่นๆ
fr: Conception des pales d’hélice: 3 lames; 4 lames; 5 lames; Autre
sk-SK: Dizajn listu vrtule: 3-čepeľový; 4-čepeľový; 5-čepeľový; Iné
es: Diseño de palas de hélice: De 3 hojas; De 4 hojas; De 5 hojas; Otros
cs: Konstrukce lopatek vrtule: Třílopatkové; Čtyřlopatkové; Pětilopatkové; Jiné
nb: Propellbladdesign: 3-blad; 4-blad; 5-blad; Annet
sv: Propellerbladskonstruktion: 3-bladig; 4-bladig; 5-bladig; Övrigt
zh-TW: 螺旋槳葉片設計: 3 葉; 4 葉; 5 葉; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova krakov propelerja: 3 kraki; 4 kraki; 5 krakov; Drugo
tr: Pervane kanadı tasarımı: 3 bıçaklı; 4 bıçaklı; 5 bıçaklı; Diğer
ro-RO: Design pală elice: 3 lame; 4 lame; 5 lame; Altele
en: Propeller blade design: 3-blade; 4-blade; 5-blade; Other
hr-HR: Dizajn lopatica propelera: Tri oštrice; Četiri oštrice; Pet oštrica; Ostalo
ko: 프로펠러 블레이드 디자인: 3블레이드; 4블레이드; 5블레이드; 기타
da: Propelbladsdesign: 3-blade; 4-blade; 5-blade; Andet
de: Propellerblattdesign: 3-Blatt; 4-Blatt; 5-Blatt; Sonstiges
pl: Konstrukcja łopatek śmigła: 3-ostrzowy; 4-ostrzowy; 5-ostrzowy; Inne
nl: Ontwerp propellerblad: 3-bladig; 4-bladig; 5-bladig; Andere
pt-BR: Formato da pá da hélice: 3 lâminas; 4 lâminas; 5 lâminas; Outro